Florida, session 2026, HB229.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Shane Jones Act."
Section 2. Subsection (3) is added to section 908.11,
Florida Statutes, to read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb229-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 229 2026
908.11 Immigration enforcement assistance agreements;
reporting requirement; penalty.—
(3) The Department of Law Enforcement shall impose a fine
of $10,000 against a law enforcement agency for each violation
of this section. The department shall use the moneys collected
from these fines to provide compensation to victims of
unauthorized aliens pursuant to s. 908.14.
Section 3. Section 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
908.14 Compensation for victims of unauthorized aliens.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "unauthorized alien"
has the same meaning as in s. 908.111(1).
(2) The Department of Law Enforcement may develop a
program to compensate residents of this state who have suffered
harm caused by an unauthorized alien.
(3) In order to be eligible for compensation under this
section:
(a) The act or omission which caused the harm must have
occurred in this state on or after July 1, 2026.
(b) The preponderance of the evidence must show that an
unauthorized alien materially contributed to the harm for which
compensation is sought.
(c) The person seeking compensation must complete a form
prescribed by the Department of Law Enforcement.
(4) The Department of Law Enforcement shall develop rules
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb229-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 229 2026
to administer this section.
Section 4. Section 908.15, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
908.15 Cause of action for wrongful death caused by an
unauthorized alien.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "unauthorized alien"
has the same meaning as in s. 908.111(1).
(2) The estate of a person killed by an unauthorized alien
has a cause of action against:
(a) A local governmental entity or law enforcement agency
that has a sanctuary policy in violation of s. 908.103.
(b) A law enforcement agency in violation of s. 908.11 or
in violation of the agreement required under that section.
(3) A plaintiff must show by a preponderance of the
evidence that a failure by a local governmental entity or law
enforcement agency to cooperate or fully comply with federal
immigration authorities or with an immigration detainer allowed
an unauthorized alien to have materially contributed to the
decedent's death.
(4) Notwithstanding s. 768.28, and in accordance with s.
13, Art. X of the State Constitution, the state waives sovereign
immunity for liability for torts under this section.
Section 5. Subsection (21) is added to section 768.28,
Florida Statutes, to read:
768.28 Waiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions;
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb229-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 229 2026
recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a
riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations;
exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.—
(21) This section does not apply to actions brought under
s. 908.15.
Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb229-00